Washington statutes.
RCW 10.88.320

Charge or complaint—Warrant of arrest.

(1) Whenever any person within this state shall be charged on the oath of any credible person before any judge or magistrate of this state with the commission of any crime in any other state and, except in cases arising under RCW 10.88.250, with having fled from justice, or with having been convicted of a crime in that state and having escaped from confinement, or having broken the terms of such person's bail, probation, or parole, or whenever complaint shall have been made before any judge or magistrate in this state setting forth on the affidavit of any credible person in another state that a crime has been committed in such other state and that the accused has been charged in such state with the commission of the crime, and, except in cases arising under RCW 10.88.250, has fled from justice, or with having been convicted of a crime in that state and having escaped from confinement, or having broken the terms of such person's bail, probation, or parole and is believed to be in this state, the judge or magistrate shall issue a warrant directed to any peace officer commanding such officer to apprehend the person named therein, wherever such person may be found in this state, and to bring such person before the same or any other judge, magistrate or court who or which may be available in or convenient of access to the place where the arrest may be made, to answer the charge or complaint and affidavit, and a certified copy of the sworn charge or complaint and affidavit upon which the warrant is issued shall be attached to the warrant.

(2) Any person making such charge or complaint and affidavit under this section with information that the charge for the commission of the crime in another state is related to criminal liability that is based on the provision, receipt, attempted provision or receipt, assistance in the provision or receipt, or attempted assistance in the provision or receipt of protected health care services as defined in RCW 7.115.010 that are lawful in the state of Washington has an affirmative duty to disclose to the judge or magistrate that the charge for the commission of the crime in another state is related to criminal liability that is based on the provision, receipt, attempted provision or receipt, assistance in the provision or receipt, or attempted assistance in the provision or receipt of protected health care services as defined in RCW 7.115.010 that are lawful in the state of Washington and shall provide an attestation stating whether such charge or complaint relates to criminal liability that is based on such protected health care services. Any false attestation submitted under this subsection is subject to a statutory penalty of $10,000 per violation. Submission of such attestation subjects the attester to the jurisdiction of the courts of Washington state for any suit, penalty, or damages arising out of a false attestation under this section.

(3) Except in cases arising under RCW 10.88.220, the issuance of a warrant is prohibited for a charge or complaint that is related to criminal liability that is based on the provision, receipt, attempted provision or receipt, assistance in the provision or receipt, or attempted assistance in the provision or receipt of protected health care services as defined in RCW 7.115.010 that are lawful in the state of Washington.

[ 2023 c 193 s 9; 2010 c 8 s 1075; 1971 ex.s. c 46 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 193: See note following RCW 7.115.020.